Utah statutes.
75-2-104.   Requirement of survival by 120 hours -- Individual in gestation.
(1)  For purposes of intestate succession, homestead allowance, and exempt
property, and except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2), the following
rules apply:
(a)  An individual born before a decedent's death who fails to survive the
decedent by 120 hours is considered to have predeceased the decedent.  If it
is not established by clear and convincing evidence that an individual born
before the decedent's death survived the decedent by 120 hours, it is
considered that the individual failed to survive for the required period.
(b)  An individual in gestation at a decedent's death is considered to be
living at the decedent's death if the individual lives 120 hours after birth.
If it is not established by clear and convincing evidence that an individual
in gestation at the decedent's death lived 120 hours after birth, it is
considered that the individual failed to survive for the required period.
(2)  This section does not apply if its application would cause the estate to
pass to the state under Section 75-2-105.
